Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-746
Enforcement of act; director;
powers; construction of act; failure
to comply with act; effect.

(1) The director may request
the Attorney General to enforce the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act. A civil enforcement action by the Attorney
General may be filed in the district court of Lancaster County. A civil enforcement
action by the Attorney General may seek temporary and permanent injunctive
relief, restitution for a borrower aggrieved by a violation of the act, and
costs for the investigation and prosecution of the enforcement action.

(2) Except when expressly
authorized, there shall be no private cause of action for any violation of
the act.

(3) Nothing in the act
shall limit any statutory or common-law right of any person to bring any action
in any court for any act involved in the mortgage banking business or the
right of the state to punish any person for any violation of law.

(4) Failure to comply with the act shall not affect the validity or enforceability
of any residential mortgage
loan. A person acquiring a residential mortgage
loan or an interest in a residential mortgage
loan is not required to ascertain the extent of compliance with the act.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,2008, § 45-717.02;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 31.